Washington statutes.
RCW 16.36.102

Duty to bury carcass of diseased livestock—Dead livestock presumed diseased.

Every person owning or having in charge any livestock that has died because of disease shall dispose of the carcass within a time frame and in a manner prescribed in rule by the director, which may include, but is not limited to, burial, composting, incinerating, landfilling, natural decomposition, or rendering. Any livestock found dead from an unknown cause is presumed to have died because of disease.

[ 2006 c 155 s 1; 1949 c 100 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3142-2. Formerly RCW 16.36.092, 16.68.020.]